New Mexico, session 2026, SB194.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Five million dollars ($5,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the higher education department for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 for a new softball and baseball field at Luna community college. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. .233543.1